Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 5. Distributions, Withdrawal, and Return of Contribution.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 836-840.

Sec. 32.11.240.
Interim distributions.

Except as provided in AS

32.11.240

—

32.11.310

, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before the partner’s withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up of the partnership to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 11 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Sec. 32.11.250.
Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to the general partner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.260.
Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may not withdraw from a limited partnership except at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the partnership agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under applicable law, unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise, a limited partner may not withdraw from a limited partnership before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.

Sec. 32.11.270.
Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in AS

32.11.240

—

32.11.310

, upon withdrawal a withdrawing partner is entitled to receive a distribution to which the withdrawing partner is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, the withdrawing partner is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of the withdrawing partner’s interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based upon the withdrawing partner’s right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, see AS 32.10 in the 1986 pamphlet and the 1992 supplement.

For applicability of the provisions of former AS 32.10 governing distributions to a withdrawing partner of a limited partnership formed before July 1, 1993, rather than this section, see § 3(c), ch. 128, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 32.11.280.
Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of the partner’s contribution, does not have the right to demand and receive a distribution from a limited partnership in a form other than cash. Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of an asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the partner exceeds a percentage of that asset that is equal to the percentage in which the partner shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Sec. 32.11.290.
Right to distribution.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.300.
Limitations on distribution.

A partner may not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 25 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Sec. 32.11.310.
Liability upon return of contribution.

If a partner has received the return of a part of the partner’s contribution without violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, the partner is liable to the limited partnership for a period of one year thereafter for the amount of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities to creditors who extended credit to the limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the partnership.

If a partner has received the return of a part of the partner’s contribution in violation of the partnership agreement or this chapter, the partner is liable to the limited partnership for a period of six years thereafter for the amount of the contribution wrongfully returned.

A partner receives a return of the partner’s contribution to the extent that a distribution to the partner reduces the partner’s share of the fair value of the net assets of the limited partnership below the value, as set out in the partnership records required to be kept under AS

32.11.840

, of the partner’s contribution that has not been distributed to the partner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3(a), ch. 128, SLA 1992 provides that this section does “not apply to a limited partnership contribution or distribution, unless the contribution or distribution is made after July 1, 1993.”

Under § 22(a), ch. 87, SLA 1994, the 1994 amendment to (c) of this section by § 14, ch. 87, SLA 1994 applies only to a limited partnership distribution made after June 7, 1994.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 874-877.